Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 2. HEALTH

SUBTITLE D. PREVENTION, CONTROL, AND REPORTS OF DISEASES; PUBLIC HEALTH DISASTERS AND EMERGENCIES

CHAPTER 94A. STATE PLAN FOR STREPTOCOCCUS PNEUMONIAE; EDUCATION AND PREVENTION PROGRAM

Sec. 94A.001. STATE PLAN FOR STREPTOCOCCUS PNEUMONIAE. (a) The department, using existing resources and programs to the extent possible, shall develop a state plan for prevention and treatment of diseases caused by Streptococcus pneumoniae. The plan must include strategies for prevention and treatment of diseases caused by Streptococcus pneumoniae in specific demographic groups that are disproportionately affected by the diseases, including persons who are elderly, children under two years of age, persons living in long-term care facilities, persons with a chronic heart or lung disease, smokers, and persons with asplenia.

Text of subsection effective until April 01, 2025

(b) In developing the plan, the department shall seek the advice of:

(1) the public, including members of the public who have been infected with Streptococcus pneumoniae;

(2) each state agency that provides services to persons infected with Streptococcus pneumoniae or that is assigned duties related to diseases caused by Streptococcus pneumoniae, including any appropriate health and human services agency described by Section 531.001, Government Code, the Employees Retirement System of Texas, and the Teacher Retirement System of Texas;

(3) any advisory body that addresses issues related to diseases caused by Streptococcus pneumoniae;

(4) public advocates concerned with issues related to diseases caused by Streptococcus pneumoniae;

(5) providers of services to persons with diseases caused by Streptococcus pneumoniae;

(6) a statewide professional association of physicians; and

(7) a statewide professional association of nurses.

Text of subsection effective on April 01, 2025

(b) In developing the plan, the department shall seek the advice of:

(1) the public, including members of the public who have been infected with Streptococcus pneumoniae;

(2) each state agency that provides services to persons infected with Streptococcus pneumoniae or that is assigned duties related to diseases caused by Streptococcus pneumoniae, including any appropriate health and human services agency described by Section 521.0001, Government Code, the Employees Retirement System of Texas, and the Teacher Retirement System of Texas;

(3) any advisory body that addresses issues related to diseases caused by Streptococcus pneumoniae;

(4) public advocates concerned with issues related to diseases caused by Streptococcus pneumoniae;

(5) providers of services to persons with diseases caused by Streptococcus pneumoniae;

(6) a statewide professional association of physicians; and

(7) a statewide professional association of nurses.

(c) The department shall review and modify as necessary the state plan developed under this section at least once every five years and may update the state plan biennially.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 994 (H.B. 970), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 2.35, eff. April 1, 2025.

Sec. 94A.002. STREPTOCOCCUS PNEUMONIAE EDUCATION AND PREVENTION PROGRAM. (a) The department shall develop a program to heighten awareness and enhance knowledge and understanding of Streptococcus pneumoniae.

(b) The program developed under Subsection (a) must require the department to:

(1) conduct health education, public awareness, and community outreach activities to promote public awareness and knowledge about the risk factors for, the value of early detection of, available screening services for, and the options available for the treatment of diseases caused by Streptococcus pneumoniae; and

(2) post on the department's Internet website the options available for the prevention, treatment, and detection of diseases caused by Streptococcus pneumoniae and information on the risk factors for, method of transmission of, and value of early detection of the diseases.

(c) The department, using existing resources, may include in the program developed under Subsection (a) a study to estimate the current and future impact on this state of diseases caused by Streptococcus pneumoniae.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 994 (H.B. 970), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.